Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5416
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-5416 to 44-5431 shall be known and may be cited as the Utilization Review Act.

Laws 1992, LB 428, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 44-5401;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 1.